test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VV_gookookohoo_gt-glossing.yaml
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: ngookookhoonsmish
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: ggookookhoonymish
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: ggookookhoonsmish
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: gookookhoonymish
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: gookookhoonsmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: ngookookhoonyminaa
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: ngookookhoonsminaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: ggookookhoonyminaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl: ggookookhoonymiwaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: ggookookhoonsminaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl: ggookookhoonsmiwaa
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4: gookookhoonymini
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4: gookookhoonsmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: ngookookhoonymiba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoonymidig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: ngookookhoonsmiba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoonsmidig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: ggookookhoonymiba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonymidig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: ggookookhoonsmiba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonsmidig
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: gookookhoonymiba
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gookookhoonymidig
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: gookookhoonsmiba
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gookookhoonsmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: ngookookhoonyman
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: ngookookhoonyming
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: ngookookhoonymag
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: ngookookhoonsman
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: ngookookhoonsming
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: ngookookhoonsmag
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: ggookookhoonyman
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: ggookookhoonyming
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: ggookookhoonymag
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: ggookookhoonsman
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: ggookookhoonsming
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: ggookookhoonsmag
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: gookookhoonyman
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: gookookhoonyming
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: gookookhoonsman
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: gookookhoonsming
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: gookookhoonyman
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: gookookhoonyming
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: gookookhoonymag
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: gookookhoonsman
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: gookookhoonsming
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: gookookhoonsmag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: ngookookhoonyshinaa
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: ngookookhoonsshinaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: ggookookhoonyshinaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl: ggookookhoonyshiwaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: ggookookhoonsshinaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl: ggookookhoonsshiwaa
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+3+4: gookookhoonyshini
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4: gookookhoonsshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: ngookookhoonyshiba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoonyshidig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: ngookookhoonsshiba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoonsshidig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: ggookookhoonyshiba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonyshidig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: ggookookhoonsshiba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonsshidig
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: gookookhoonyshiba
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: gookookhoonyshidig
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: gookookhoonsshiba
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: gookookhoonsshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+4: ngookookhoonyshan
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: ngookookhoonyshing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: ngookookhoonyshag
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+4: ngookookhoonsshan
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: ngookookhoonsshing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: ngookookhoonsshag
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+4: ggookookhoonyshan
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: ggookookhoonyshing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: ggookookhoonyshag
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+4: ggookookhoonsshan
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: ggookookhoonsshing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: ggookookhoonsshag
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+4: gookookhoonyshan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: gookookhoonyshing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+4: gookookhoonsshan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: gookookhoonsshing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+4: gookookhoonyshan
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: gookookhoonyshing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: gookookhoonyshag
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+4: gookookhoonsshan
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: gookookhoonsshing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: gookookhoonsshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: ngookookhoonynaanba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoonynaandig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: ngookookhoonsnaanba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoonsnaandig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: ggookookhoonynaanba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonynaandig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt: ggookookhoonywaaba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonywaadig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: ggookookhoonsnaanba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonsnaandig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt: ggookookhoonswaaba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonswaadig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+3+4+Prt: gookookhoonyniwba
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt: gookookhoonsniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: ngookookhoonynaanin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: ngookookhoonynaaning
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: ngookookhoonynaanig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: ngookookhoonsnaanin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: ngookookhoonsnaaning
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: ngookookhoonsnaanig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: ggookookhoonynaanin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: ggookookhoonynaaning
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: ggookookhoonynaanig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: ggookookhoonywaan
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: ggookookhoonywaang
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+2+Pl+Pl: ggookookhoonywaag
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: ggookookhoonsnaanin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: ggookookhoonsnaaning
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: ggookookhoonsnaanig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: ggookookhoonswaan
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: ggookookhoonswaang
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Pl: ggookookhoonswaag
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: gookookhoonywaan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: gookookhoonywaang
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+3+4+4: gookookhoonyniwan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+3+4+Loc: gookookhoonyniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: gookookhoonswaan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: gookookhoonswaang
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+3+4+4: gookookhoonsniwan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+3+4+Loc: gookookhoonsniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt+4: ngookookhoonybaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoonybaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoonybaniig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt+4: ngookookhoonsbaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoonsbaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoonsbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt+4: ggookookhoonybaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonybaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonybaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt+4: ggookookhoonsbaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonsbaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonsbaniig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt+4: gookookhoonybaniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonybaniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt+4: gookookhoonsbaniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonsbaniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt+4: gookookhoonybaniin
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonybaniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: gookookhoonybaniig
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt+4: gookookhoonsbaniin
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonsbaniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: gookookhoonsbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: ngookookhoomshinaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: ggookookhoomshinaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: ggookookhoomshiwaa
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: gookookhoomshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: ngookookhoomshiba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoomshidig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: ggookookhoomshiba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoomshidig
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gookookhoomshiba
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gookookhoomshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: ngookookhoomshan
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: ngookookhoomshing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: ngookookhoomshag
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: ggookookhoomshan
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: ggookookhoomshing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: ggookookhoomshag
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: gookookhoomshan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gookookhoomshing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: gookookhoomshan
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gookookhoomshing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gookookhoomshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: ngookookhoomnaanba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoomnaandig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: ggookookhoomnaanba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoomnaandig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: ggookookhoomwaaba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoomwaadig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: gookookhoomniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: ngookookhoomnaanin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: ngookookhoomnaaning
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: ngookookhoomnaanig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: ggookookhoomnaanin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: ggookookhoomnaaning
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: ggookookhoomnaanig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: ggookookhoomwaan
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: ggookookhoomwaang
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: ggookookhoomwaag
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gookookhoomwaan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gookookhoomwaang
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+3+4+4: gookookhoomniwan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: gookookhoomniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: ngookookhoombaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoombaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoombaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: ggookookhoombaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoombaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoombaniig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: gookookhoombaniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gookookhoombaniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: gookookhoombaniin
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gookookhoombaniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gookookhoombaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ngookookhooshnaanba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ngookookhooshnaandig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ggookookhooshnaanba
